Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0165.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 part 1 line-item appropriations Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of education for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, from the following funds: DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 583.5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 166,422,700 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 166,422,700 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 83,575,100 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 5,884,200 Total private revenues 2,547,500 Total other state restricted revenues 2,193,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 72,222,100 Sec. 102. STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION/OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 11.0 Unclassified salaries--FTE positions 6.0 $ 1,190,300 Education commission of the states 120,800 State board of education, per diem payments 24,400 State board/superintendent operations--FTEs 11.0 2,534,100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,869,600 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal revenues 313,400 Special revenue funds: Private foundations 80,000 Certification fees 99,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 3,376,400 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Sec. 103. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Full-time equated classified positions 44.6 Central support operations--FTEs 41.6 $ 6,823,100 Federal and private grants 3,005,300 Grant and contract operations--FTEs 3.0 1,902,400 Property management 4,165,000 Terminal leave payments 353,300 Training and orientation workshops 150,000 Worker's compensation 7,500 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 16,406,600 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal indirect revenues 2,329,300 Federal revenues 5,470,400 Special revenue funds: Private foundations 1,005,300 Teacher testing fees 84,200 Training and orientation workshop fees 150,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 7,367,400 Sec. 104. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY Information technology services and projects $ 4,933,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 4,933,200 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal indirect revenues 2,498,500 Federal revenues 70,600 Special revenue funds: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 State general fund/general purpose $ 2,364,100 Sec. 105. SPECIAL EDUCATION SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 47.0 Special education operations--FTEs 47.0 $ 9,831,500 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 9,831,500 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal revenues 9,026,500 Special revenue funds: Private foundations 111,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 693,200 Sec. 106. MICHIGAN SCHOOLS FOR THE DEAF AND BLIND Full-time equated classified positions 82.0 ASL literacy resource $ 500,000 Camp Tuhsmeheta--FTE 1.0 1,000,400 Low incidence outreach program 1,000,000 Michigan schools for the deaf and blind operations--FTEs 81.0 16,562,900 Private gifts - blind 200,000 Private gifts - deaf 150,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 19,413,300 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal revenues 7,672,200 Special revenue funds: Local cost sharing (schools for deaf/blind) 5,884,200 Gifts, bequests, and donations 1,350,400 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Low incidence outreach fund 1,000,000 Student insurance revenue 206,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 3,300,400 Sec. 107. EDUCATOR EXCELLENCE Full-time equated classified positions 53.0 Educator excellence operations--FTEs 52.0 $ 10,535,800 Educator recruitment and preparation programs--FTE 1.0 1,221,300 Teacher license renewals 280,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 12,037,100 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal revenues 3,173,000 Special revenue funds: Teacher testing fees 203,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 8,660,400 Sec. 108. SYSTEMS, EVALUATION, AND TECHNOLOGY Full-time equated classified positions 18.0 Office of systems, evaluation, and technology operations--FTEs 18.0 $ 3,670,100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,670,100 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal indirect revenues 148,400 Federal revenues 2,169,700 Special revenue funds: State general fund/general purpose $ 1,352,000 Sec. 109. STRATEGIC PLANNING AND IMPLEMENTATION 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Full-time equated classified positions 6.0 Strategic planning and implementation operations--FTEs 6.0 $ 1,208,400 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,208,400 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal revenues 647,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 561,300 Sec. 110. ADMINISTRATIVE LAW SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 2.0 Administrative law operations--FTEs 2.0 $ 1,426,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,426,800 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal revenues 573,300 Special revenue funds: State general fund/general purpose $ 853,500 Sec. 111. ACCOUNTABILITY SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 63.6 Accountability services operations--FTEs 63.6 $ 15,023,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 15,023,800 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal revenues 13,066,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,957,300 Sec. 112. SCHOOL SUPPORT SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 91.6 Adolescent and school health $ 334,400 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Office of health and safety--FTEs 23.0 1,615,300 Office of nutrition services--FTEs 68.6 14,517,100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 16,466,800 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal revenues 13,265,200 Special revenue funds: Commodity distribution fees 150,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 3,051,600 Sec. 113. EDUCATIONAL SUPPORTS Full-time equated classified positions 91.7 Educational supports operations--FTEs 91.7 $ 18,959,500 Media literacy training 300,000 Michigan core curriculum 750,000 School board member training 150,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 20,159,500 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal revenues 13,285,600 Special revenue funds: State general fund/general purpose $ 6,873,900 Sec. 114. CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION Full-time equated classified positions 27.0 Career and technical education operations--FTEs 27.0 $ 6,045,700 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 6,045,700 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal revenues 4,120,300 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,925,400 Sec. 115. LIBRARY OF MICHIGAN Full-time equated classified positions 33.0 Library of Michigan operations--FTEs 31.0 $ 5,122,200 Library services and technology program--FTE 1.0 5,630,600 Michigan eLibrary--FTE 1.0 1,743,200 Michigan's poet laureate 100,000 Renaissance zone reimbursements 2,200,000 State aid to libraries 17,467,700 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 32,263,700 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal revenues 5,630,600 Special revenue funds: Library fees 300,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 26,333,100 Sec. 116. PARTNERSHIP DISTRICT SUPPORT Full-time equated classified positions 13.0 Partnership district support operations--FTEs 13.0 $ 3,666,600 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,666,600 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal revenues 114,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 3,552,100 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations for fiscal year 2025-2026 general sections 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is $74,415,900.00 and state spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $19,817,700.00. The following itemized statement identifies appropriations from which spending to local units of government will occur: DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION Renaissance zone reimbursements 2,200,000 School support services operations 150,000 State aid to libraries 17,467,700 TOTAL $ 19,817,700 Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1: (a) "Department" means the department of education. (b) "DHHS" means the department of health and human services. (c) "District" means a local school district as that term is defined in section 6 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.6, or a public school academy as that term is defined in section 5 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.5. (d) "FTE" means full-time equated. (e) "HHS" means the United States Department of Health and Human Services. (f) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on the department budget, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 204. The department shall use the internet to fulfill the reporting requirements of this part. This requirement includes transmitting reports to the standard report recipients and any other required recipients by email and posting the reports on a website. Sec. 205. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1: (a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are available. (b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. (c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. (d) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, that are manufactured in facilities that employ union members. Sec. 206. The department shall not take disciplinary action against an employee of the department for communicating with a member of the legislature or legislative staff, unless the communication is prohibited by law and the department is exercising its authority as provided by law. Sec. 207. Consistent with section 217 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, the department shall prepare a report on out-of-state travel expenses not later than January 1. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 The report must list all travel by classified and unclassified employees outside this state in the previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or in part with funds appropriated in the department's budget. The department shall submit the report to the standard report recipients and to the senate and house appropriations committees. The report must include all of the following information: (a) The dates of each travel occurrence. (b) The total transportation and related expenses of each travel occurrence and the proportions funded with state general fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal revenues, and other revenues. Sec. 208. The department shall not use funds appropriated in part 1 to hire a person to provide legal services that are the responsibility of the attorney general. This section does not apply to legal services for bonding activities or to outside legal services that the attorney general authorizes. Sec. 209. Not later than December 15, the state budget office shall prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses by major departmental program or program areas. The state budget office shall transmit the report to the standard report recipients and to the chairpersons of the senate and house appropriations committees. Sec. 210. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $5,000,000.00 for federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $400,000.00 for state restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $250,000.00 for local contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,500,000.00 for private contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 211. The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to maintain a searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following for the department: (a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category. (b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit. (c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor, including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 payment description. (d) The number of active department employees by job classification. (e) Job specifications and wage rates. Sec. 212. Not later than 14 days after the release of the executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate with the state budget office to provide an annual report on estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the previous 2 fiscal years. The report must be submitted to the standard report recipients and to the chairpersons of the senate and house appropriations committees. Sec. 214. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to restrict or impede a marginalized community's access to government resources, programs, or facilities. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, local governments shall report any action or policy that attempts to restrict or interfere with the duties of the local health officer. Sec. 215. To the extent permissible under the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594, the state superintendent of public instruction shall take all reasonable steps to ensure that geographically disadvantaged business enterprises compete for and perform contracts to provide services, supplies, or both. The state superintendent of public instruction shall strongly encourage firms with which the department contracts to subcontract with certified geographically disadvantaged business enterprises for services, supplies, or both. As used in this section, "geographically disadvantaged business enterprises" means that term as defined in Executive Directive No. 2023-1. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 216. On a quarterly basis, the department shall report on the number of full-time equated positions in pay status by civil service classification, including a comparison by line item of the number of full-time equated positions authorized from funds appropriated in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated positions employed by the department at the end of the reporting period. The report must be submitted to the senate and house appropriations committees and to the standard report recipients. Sec. 218. The department shall receive and retain copies of all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department shall follow federal and state guidelines for short-term and long-term retention of records. The department may electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required by federal and state guidelines. Sec. 219. Not later than April 1, the department shall report on each specific policy change made to implement a public act affecting the department that took effect during the previous calendar year. The department shall submit the report to the standard report recipients, to the senate and house appropriations committees, and to the joint committee on administrative rules. Sec. 220. (1) General fund appropriations in part 1 shall not be expended for items if federal funding or private grant funding is available for the same expenditures. (2) If the department is required to make a reduction in expenditures under section 395(1) or (2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1395, for any appropriation under this part or part 1, the department must notify the standard report recipients not later than 10 days after the reduction. The notification required under this subsection must include, but not 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 be limited to, all of the following: (a) A description of the fund source that is insufficient to support the expenditures being reduced and the amount of the reduction. (b) A description of the cause for the reduction, if any such cause is known. (c) A description of the functions of state government or services to residents that will be affected by the reduction. Sec. 221. (1) Within 10 days after the effective date of this act, the department must provide a report to the standard report recipients that contains all of the following information: (a) A list of any sections in this act that the department determines to be unenforceable, with a detailed legal rationale for those determinations, as applicable. (b) If a determination under subdivision (a) would affect the operations of a program or programs within the department, the department must report the estimated difference in cost between the policy outlined in the section determined to be unenforceable and the policy the department intends to pursue. (2) The department may coordinate with the executive office of the governor or other state departments or agencies to compile a statewide report for any departments or agencies required to submit a report substantially similar to the report described under subsection (1). Sec. 222. To the extent possible, the department shall not expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted. Sec. 223. The state budget director shall take steps to ensure that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state under 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. A department or agency receiving an appropriation under this part or part 1 must notify the standard report recipients if an appropriation of funds described under this section is projected to lapse. Sec. 224. The department must provide a quarterly report to the standard report recipients detailing federal policy changes that do, or are expected to do, any of the following: (a) Affect the operations of the department. (b) Affect an industry, community, population, or other group regulated or served by, or that otherwise engages with, the department. (c) Affect regulations that currently protect the public to the extent that the regulations affect an industry, community, population, or other group regulated or served by, or that otherwise engages with, the department. (d) Create a regulatory gap that could negatively impact the public. department-specific general sections Sec. 301. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall provide through the internet the state board of education agenda and all supporting documents, and shall notify the state budget director and the senate and house fiscal agencies that the agenda and supporting documents are available on the internet, at the time the agenda and supporting documents are provided to state board of education members. Sec. 302. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department may assist DHHS, other departments, intermediate school 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 districts, and local school districts to secure reimbursement for eligible services provided in Michigan schools from the federal Medicaid program. The department may submit reports of direct expenses related to this effort to DHHS for reimbursement. Sec. 303. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall do both of the following: (a) Post on its website a link to the federal Institute of Education Sciences' What Works Clearinghouse. (b) Disseminate knowledge about the What Works Clearinghouse to districts and intermediate school districts so that it may be used to improve reading proficiency for pupils in grades K to 3. Sec. 304. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall coordinate with the other departments to streamline state services and resources, reduce duplication, and increase efficiency, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (a) Working with the department of treasury to coordinate with the financial independence team and overseeing deficit districts. (b) Working with DHHS and the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential to coordinate with early childhood programs and overseeing child care providers. Sec. 305. (1) As a condition of receiving appropriations in part 1, the department shall, in collaboration with DHHS, promote and support initiatives in schools and other educational organizations that include, but are not limited to, training for educators, teachers, and other personnel in school settings for all of the following: (a) Using trauma-informed practices. (b) Age-appropriate education and information on human 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 trafficking. (c) Age-appropriate education and information on sexual abuse prevention. (2) If requested by the department, the department of state police and the department of attorney general shall consult with the department in the promotion and support of initiatives in schools and other educational organizations under subsection (1). Sec. 306. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall ensure that the most recently issued report of regional in-demand occupations issued by the department of technology, management, and budget is distributed in electronic or paper form to all high schools in each school district, intermediate school district, and public school academy. STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION/OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT Sec. 351. (1) The department may use the appropriations from the state board of education, per diem payments in part 1 for per diem payments to the state board members for meetings at which a quorum is present or for performing official business authorized by the state board. The per diem payments are set at the following rates: (a) State board of education - president - $110.00 per day. (b) State board of education - member other than president - $100.00 per day. (2) The department shall not pay a state board of education member a per diem for more than 30 days per year. SPECIAL EDUCATION SERVICES Sec. 401. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for special 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 education operations, the department shall use $100,000.00 to design and distribute to all parents and legal guardians of a student with a disability the following information: (a) Federal and state mandates regarding the rights and protections of students with disabilities, including, but not limited to, individualized education programs to ensure that parents and legal guardians are fully informed about laws, rules, procedural safeguards, and problem-solving options. (b) Any other information the department determines is necessary to allow parents and legal guardians to provide meaningful input in collaboration with districts to develop and implement an individualized education program. MICHIGAN SCHOOLS FOR THE DEAF AND BLIND Sec. 451. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the employees at the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind who work on a school-year basis are considered annual employees for purposes of service credits, retirement, and insurance benefits. Sec. 452. For each student enrolled at the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind, the department shall assess the intermediate school district of residence 100% of the cost of operating the student's instructional program, excluding room and board related costs and the cost of weekend transportation between the school and the student's home. Sec. 456. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind may promote its residential program as a possible appropriate option for children who are deaf or hard of hearing or who are blind or visually impaired. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Blind shall distribute information detailing its services to all intermediate school districts in this state. (2) If an intermediate school district knows that a child in the district is deaf or hard of hearing or blind or visually impaired, the intermediate school district shall provide to the parents of the child the literature distributed by the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind to intermediate school districts under subsection (1). (3) Parents will continue to have a choice regarding the educational placement of their deaf or hard-of-hearing children. Sec. 457. Revenue received by the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind from gifts, bequests, and donations that is unexpended at the end of the state fiscal year may be carried over to the succeeding fiscal year and does not revert to the general fund. Sec. 458. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for the low incidence outreach fund are appropriated from money collected by the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind and the low incidence outreach program for providing qualified services and may be used for any expenses necessary to provide the qualified services. Any money that is unexpended at the end of the current fiscal year does not revert to the general fund and may be carried forward into the succeeding fiscal year. (2) As used in this section, "qualified services" means any of the following: (a) Document reproduction and services. (b) Conducting conferences, workshops, and training classes. (c) Providing specialized equipment, facilities, and software. Sec. 459. When conducting a due process hearing resulting from 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 a parent's appeal of that parent's child's individualized education program team's decision on the child's educational placement, a state administrative law judge shall consider designating the Michigan School for the Deaf as 1 of the options for the least restrictive environment under federal law for the parent's child who is deaf, deafblind, or hard of hearing. Sec. 460. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for ASL literacy resources, the department shall expend the funds to comply with all requirements in section 1705 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1705. EDUCATOR EXCELLENCE Sec. 501. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for educator excellence, the department shall maintain certificate revocation and felony conviction files of educational personnel. Sec. 502. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for teacher license renewals, the department shall implement a program to waive fees or associated costs for the recruitment and retention of educators. Sec. 503. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall, if requested by the Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute, consult with the Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute and external stakeholders in connection with the department's implementation and administration of professional development training described in section 35a of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1635a, including, but not limited to, the online training of educators of pupils in grades K to 3 described in that section. Sec. 504. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for educator 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 recruitment and preparation programs, the department shall award $540,000.00 to districts for both of the following: (a) Educator preparation program tuition, program fees, testing fees, and substitute permit costs for any individual employed in grades pre-k to 12 working toward certification or an additional endorsement. (b) Program costs associated with hands-on learning experiences for students in grades 6 to 12 interested in the field of education, with supervision and mentoring from educators who are champions of, and committed to, the success of the profession. Sec. 505. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for educator recruitment and preparation programs, not less than $190,000.00 and not fewer than 1.0 FTE position is allocated for educator recruitment and preparation programs. Sec. 506. Revenue received from teacher testing fees that is unexpended at the end of the current fiscal year may be carried over to the succeeding fiscal year and does not revert to the general fund. Sec. 507. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall adopt a teacher certification test that ensures that all newly certified elementary teachers have the skills to deliver evidence-based literacy instruction grounded in the science of reading. The department may use teacher certification or teacher testing fee revenue to the extent allowable under law to implement this section, or may pass along increased testing fees to teachers as allowable and appropriate. SCHOOL SUPPORT SERVICES Sec. 601. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for adolescent 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 and school health, the department shall use the funds to replace federal funding reductions from the HHS - Centers for Disease Control and Prevention to the department and section 39a(2)(a) of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1639a. Sec. 602. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for school board member training, there is appropriated $150,000.00 for school board member training. The department shall approve 1 or more training programs for school board members that include courses of instruction for school board members in 1 or more of the following topic areas: (a) Conflicts of interest, including, but not limited to, the application of section 1203 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1203. (b) Labor relations, including, but not limited to, a school board's role in collective bargaining agreements in 1947 PA 336, MCL 423.201 to 423.217, and in other laws related to employment. (c) Education law, including, but not limited to, the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1 to 380.1852, the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1601 to 388.1896, the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275, and 1937 (Ex Sess) PA 4, MCL 38.71 to 38.191, dealing with teacher tenure. (d) School finance, including, but not limited to, the creation and management of school district budgets. (e) Board governance, including, but not limited to, roles and responsibilities, parliamentary procedure, and best practices. (f) Implicit bias training. (g) Rater reliability training. (2) On completion of an eligible training program, a school board member may apply for reimbursement for the cost of the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 eligible training program through the board member's local district, up to $100.00 per course. The department may determine the form and manner of the application to reimburse the district for the cost. (3) The department shall create a process for the provider of a course in a topic listed in subsection (1) to apply to the department to have the course approved and be eligible for a school board member to be reimbursed for completing that course as provided under subsection (2). (4) As used in this section: (a) "Eligible training program" means a training program that is approved under subsection (1). (b) "School board member" means a member of the board of a school district or intermediate school district or a member of the board of directors of a public school academy in this state. Sec. 604. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, not less than $359,500.00 and not fewer than 2.0 FTE positions shall provide technical assistance to all eligible districts to make them effective at using Medicaid dollars for mental health. (2) As used in this section, "eligible district" means a school district or intermediate school district that receives funding under section 31n of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1631n. EDUCATIONAL SUPPORTS Sec. 701. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for educational supports, the department shall produce a report detailing the progress made by districts with grades K to 12 receiving at-risk funding under section 31a of the state school aid 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1631a, in doing both of the following: (a) Implementing multitiered systems of supports in the previous school fiscal year for grades K to 12. (b) Providing reading intervention services described in section 1280f of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1280f, for pupils in grades K to 12. (2) The department shall include, at a minimum, all of the following in the report described in subsection (1): (a) A description of the training, coaching, and technical assistance offered by the department to districts to support the implementation of effective multitiered systems of supports and reading intervention programs. (b) A list of districts determined by the department to have successfully implemented multitiered systems of supports and reading intervention programs. (c) A list of best practices that the department has identified that may be used by districts to implement multitiered systems of supports and reading intervention programs. (d) Other information the department determines would be useful to understanding the status of districts' implementation of effective multitiered systems of supports and reading intervention programs. (3) The department shall provide the report described in subsection (1) to the state budget director, the house and senate subcommittees that oversee the department and school aid budgets, and the house and senate fiscal agencies by September 30 of the current fiscal year. Sec. 702. From the funds appropriated in part 1, there is 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 appropriated an amount not less than $1,000,000.00 for implementation costs associated with programs for early childhood literacy funded under section 35a of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1635a. Sec. 703. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for Michigan core curriculum, the department shall, in collaboration with the confederation of Michigan tribal education department, continuously design, implement, and evaluate professional learning and optional curriculum modules for the purpose of teaching Michigan Indigenous tribal history including the history of Indian boarding schools in Michigan as described in the Michigan core curriculum standards for grades 8 to 12. Sec. 704. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for educational supports, there is appropriated an amount not less than $150,000.00 and not fewer than 1.0 FTE position for implementation costs associated with section 1281c of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1281c. Sec. 705. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for media literacy training, the department shall design, implement, and evaluate professional learning and optional curriculum modules for the purpose of teaching artificial intelligence and media literacy in this state. LIBRARY OF MICHIGAN Sec. 801. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for library fees are appropriated from money collected by the library of Michigan for providing qualified services and may be used for any expenses necessary to provide the qualified services. Any money that is unexpended at the end of the current fiscal year does not 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 lapse to the general fund and may be carried forward into the succeeding fiscal year. (2) As used in this section, "qualified services" means any of the following: (a) Document reproduction and services. (b) Conducting conferences, workshops, and training classes. (c) Providing specialized equipment, facilities, and software. Sec. 802. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for state aid to libraries, there is appropriated $900,000.00 to support the Michigan electronic library system. Sec. 804. (1) The department shall use the funds appropriated in part 1 for renaissance zone reimbursements to reimburse public libraries under section 12 of the Michigan renaissance zone act, 1996 PA 376, MCL 125.2692, for taxes levied in 2025. The department shall allocate the funds not later than 60 days after the department of treasury certifies to the department and to the state budget director that the department of treasury has received all necessary information to properly determine the amounts due to each eligible recipient. (2) If the amount appropriated under this section is not sufficient to fully pay obligations under this section, the department shall prorate payments on an equal basis among all eligible recipients. Sec. 805. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for Michigan's poet laureate, there is appropriated $100,000.00 to support the Michigan poet laureate program to promote poetry, the spoken word, and literary arts across this state.